incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="ga/te__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tí</l>
        <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>te<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="hrs/ť__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kúpe/le__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľov</l>
        <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľom</l>
        <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľoch</l>
        <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľmi</l>
        <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="revu/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="revu/e__BASESG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="revue__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/lnce__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lnca</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lncu</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lnce</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lnci</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lnce</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lncom</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lnce</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ĺnc</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lnciam</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lncia</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lnciach</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lncia</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lncami</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lncia</l>
        <r>lnce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Morse__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovia</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovia</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="žiab/re__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ier</l>
        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l>
        <r>re<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="rakij/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Vianoc/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="guč/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dv/ere__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erí</l>
        <r>ere<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ier</l>
        <r>ere<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r>ere<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="dver/e__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Labe__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>m</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sa/ne__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ní</l>
        <r>ne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ne<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="sa/ne__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Abrahám"><i>Abrahám</i><par n="Morse__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Labe"><i>Labe</i><par n="Labe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Morse"><i>Morse</i><par n="Morse__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Róm"><i>Róm</i><par n="Morse__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Vianoce"><i>Vianoc</i><par n="Vianoc/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bohém"><i>bohém</i><par n="Morse__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvere"><i>dv</i><par n="dv/ere__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gate"><i>ga</i><par n="ga/te__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kúpele"><i>kúpe</i><par n="kúpe/le__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moslim"><i>moslim</i><par n="Morse__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mím"><i>mím</i><par n="Morse__n"/></e>
    <e lm="otčim"><i>otčim</i><par n="Morse__n"/></e>
    <e lm="revue"><i>revu</i><par n="revu/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slnce"><i>s</i><par n="s/lnce__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sane"><i>sa</i><par n="sa/ne__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tesť"><i>tesť</i><par n="Morse__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žiabre"><i>žiab</i><par n="žiab/re__n"/></e>
